South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S33.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-771(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The voter may choose a person to remain in the vehicle while the voter is casting his ballot. The voter shall make it known to the manager who the voter chooses to remain in the vehicle. No person other than the voter and the person chosen by the voter to remain in the vehicle are is permitted in the vehicle in which the voter is casting his ballot unless the voter is entitled to assistance as provided in Section 7-13-770. SECTION 2.  Section 7-13-780 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-780.  Only those persons who are unable to read or write, or who are physically unable or incapacitated from preparing a ballot or voting, or due to the person's handicap or age cannot enter the polling place or cannot stand in line to vote shall be entitled to receive assistance of any kind in voting. SECTION 3.  Section 7-5-180 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-5-180. Except as otherwise provided by law, a A person who has not attained the age of eighteen years before the closing of the books of registration preceding any election, including presidential primary elections, but attains that age before the next ensuing election may register to vote in the next ensuing election in the manner provided in Section 7-5-185, Section 7-5-320, or by appearing appears before the county board of voter registration and elections. and makes application for registration, The application to the county board of voter registration and elections must be made under oath as to the facts above stated entitling a person to registration, and the board shall register the applicant, if he is otherwise qualified.  Any person not laboring under the disabilities named in the Constitution and in Section 7-5-120 and whose qualification as an elector is completed after the closing of the registration books, but before the next ensuing election, has the right to apply for and secure registration at any time within one hundred twenty days immediately preceding the closing of the books for the election or for the primary election preceding the election.  Written notification of approval or rejection must be issued personally or mailed by the board to each applicant on a form to be prescribed and provided by the State Election Commission.  The decision of the county board of voter registration and elections may be appealed as provided by Section 7-5-230. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----